Idaho, session 2025, S1118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2803. EXCLUSIONS. The procurement requirements established in
this chapter shall not be applicable to:
(1) The acquisition of personal property when the procurement dupli-
cates the price and substance of a contract for like goods or services that
has been competitively bid by the state of Idaho, one (1) of its political
subdivisions, or an agency of the federal government;
(2) Contracts or purchases where expenditures to procure public works
construction are less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) or where expenditures to procure services or
personal property are less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), provided such contracts or purchases
shall be guided by the best interests of the political subdivision procuring
the goods and services as determined by the governing board;
(3) Disbursement of wages or compensation to any employee, official or
agent of a political subdivision for the performance of personal services
for the political subdivision;
(4) Procurement of personal or professional services to be performed by
an independent contractor for the political subdivision;
(5) Procurement of an interest in real property;
(6) Procurement of insurance;
(7) Costs of participation in a joint powers agreement with other units
of government;
(8) Procurement of used personal property;
(9) Procurement from federal government general services administra-
tion (GSA) schedules or federal multiple award schedules (MAS);
(10) Procurement of personal property or services through contracts en-
tered into by the division of purchasing of the department of administration
of the state of Idaho;
(11) Procurement of goods for direct resale;
(12) Procurement of travel and training;


(13) Procurement of goods and services from Idaho correctional indus-
tries;
(14) Procurement of repair for heavy equipment;
(15) Procurement of software maintenance, support and licenses of an
existing system or platform that was bid in compliance with state law;
(16) Procurement of public utilities;
(17) Procurement of food for use in jails or detention facilities; or
(18) Procurement of used equipment at an auction if authorized by the
governing board.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-2805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2805. PROCUREMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS CONSTRUCTION. (1) When a po-
litical subdivision contemplates an expenditure to procure public works
construction valued at or in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) but
not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) but not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000), the procurement procedures of this subsection shall apply:
(a) The solicitation for bids for the public works construction to be
performed shall be supplied to no fewer than three (3) owner-desig-
nated licensed public works contractors by written means, either by
electronic or physical delivery. The solicitation shall describe the
construction work to be completed in sufficient detail to allow an expe-
rienced public works contractor to understand the construction project
the political subdivision seeks to build.
(b) The solicitation for bids shall describe the electronic or physi-
cal delivery method or methods authorized to submit a bid, the date and
time by which a bid proposal must be received by the clerk, secretary or
other authorized official of the political subdivision, and shall pro-
vide a reasonable time to respond to the solicitation, provided that ex-
cept in the event of an emergency, such time shall not be less than three
(3) business days.
(c) Written objections to specifications or bid procedures must be re-
ceived by the clerk, secretary or other authorized official of the po-
litical subdivision at least one (1) business day before the date and
time upon which bids are scheduled to be received.
(d) When written bids have been received, by either physical or elec-
tronic delivery, they shall be submitted to the governing board or a de-
signee of the governing board who shall present the lowest responsive
bid to the governing board for approval or, if authorized, approve the
bid. The governing board or the board's designee shall approve the re-
sponsive bid proposing the lowest procurement price or reject all bids
and publish notice for bids, as before.
(e) If the political subdivision finds that it is impractical or impos-
sible to obtain three (3) bids for the proposed public works procure-
ment, the political subdivision may acquire the work in any manner the
political subdivision deems best from a qualified public works contrac-
tor quoting the lowest price. When fewer than three (3) bids are consid-
ered, a description of the efforts undertaken to procure at least three
(3) bids shall be documented by the political subdivision and such docu-


mentation shall be maintained for at least six (6) months after the pro-
curement decision is made. If two (2) or more price quotations offered
by different licensed public works contractors are the same and the low-
est responsive bids, the governing board or governing-board authorized
official may accept the one (1) it chooses.
(2) When a political subdivision contemplates an expenditure to pur-
chase public works construction valued in excess of two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the
procurement procedures of this subsection shall apply. The purchase of
construction services shall be made pursuant to a competitive sealed bid
process with the purchase to be made from the qualified public works contrac-
tor submitting the lowest bid price complying with bidding procedures and
meeting the prequalifications, if any are provided, established by the bid
documents. Competitive bidding for public works may proceed through either
of two (2) alternative procedures as set forth below:
(a) Category A. Competitive bidding procedures shall be open to receipt
of bids from any licensed public works contractor desiring to bid upon a
public works project. For a category A bid, the political subdivision
may only consider the amount bid, bidder compliance with administrative
requirements of the bidding process, and whether the bidder holds the
requisite license, and shall award the bid to the qualified bidder sub-
mitting the lowest responsive bid.
(i) The request for bids for a category A procurement shall set
a date and place for the public opening of bids. Two (2) notices
soliciting bids shall be published in the official newspaper of
the political subdivision. The first notice shall be published
at least two (2) weeks before the date for opening bids, with the
second notice to be published in the succeeding week at least seven
(7) days before the date that bids are scheduled to be opened. The
notice shall succinctly describe the project to be constructed.
Copies of specifications, bid forms, bidder's instructions, con-
tract documents, and general and special instructions shall be
made available upon request and payment of a reasonable plan copy
fee by any interested bidder.
(ii) Written objections to specifications or bidding procedures
must be received by the clerk, secretary or other authorized of-
ficial of the political subdivision at least three (3) business
days before the date and time upon which bids are scheduled to
be opened. The administrative officer or governing board super-
vising the bidding process shall respond to any such objection
in writing and communicate such response to the objector and all
other plan holders, adjusting bidding timeframes if necessary.
(iii) All bids shall be presented or otherwise delivered under
sealed cover to the clerk of the political subdivision or other au-
thorized agent of the political subdivision designated by the in-
formation provided to bidders by the political subdivision with a
concise statement marked on the outside generally identifying the
project to which the bid pertains.
(iv) If the political subdivision deems it is in the political
subdivision's best interest, it may require the bidder to provide


bid security in an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of the
amount bid. If required, a bid shall not be considered unless one
(1) of the forms of bidder's security is enclosed with it, and un-
less the bid is submitted in a form which substantially complies
with the form provided by the political subdivision. The politi-
cal subdivision may require that the bid security be in one (1) of
the following forms:
(A) Cash;
(B) A cashier's check made payable to the political subdivi-
sion;
(C) A certified check made payable to the political subdivi-
sion; or
(D) A bidder's bond executed by a qualified surety company,
made payable to the political subdivision.
(v) Any bid received by the political subdivision may not be
withdrawn after the date and time set in the notice for opening of
bids. When sealed bids have been received, they shall be opened in
public at a designated place and time, thereafter to be compiled
and submitted to the governing board for award or, if a designee is
authorized, for approval of the award.
(vi) If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract, the
amount of his bidder's security may be forfeited to the political
subdivision at the sole discretion of the political subdivision
and the proceeds shall be deposited in a designated fund out of
which the expenses of procuring substitute performance are paid.
(vii) The political subdivision may, on the refusal or failure of
the successful bidder to execute the contract, award the contract
to the qualified bidder submitting the next lowest responsive bid.
If the governing board awards the contract to the next lowest qual-
ified bidder, the amount of the lowest qualified bidder's secu-
rity may be applied by the political subdivision to the difference
between the lowest responsive bid and the next lowest responsive
bid, and the surplus, if any, shall be returned to the lowest bid-
der if cash or check is used, or to the surety on the bidder's bond
if a bond is used, less reasonable administrative costs not to ex-
ceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the bidder's secu-
rity to the owner.
(viii) In its discretion, the governing board may reject all bids
presented and re-bid, or the governing board may, after finding it
to be a fact, pass a resolution declaring that the project sought
to be accomplished by the expenditure can be performed more eco-
nomically by purchasing goods and services on the open market. If
identical bids are received, the governing board may choose the
bidder it prefers. If no bids are received, the governing board
may procure the goods or services without further competitive bid-
ding procedures.
(ix) If the governing board of any political subdivision chooses
to award a competitively bid contract involving the procurement of
public works construction to a bidder other than the apparent low
bidder, the political subdivision shall declare its reason or rea-


sons on the record and shall communicate such reason or reasons in
writing to all persons who have submitted a competing bid.
(x) If any participating bidder objects to such award, such bid-
der shall respond in writing to the notice from the political sub-
division within seven (7) calendar days of the date of transmittal
of the notice, setting forth in such response the express reason
or reasons that the award decision of the governing board is in er-
ror. Thereafter, staying performance of any procurement until af-
ter addressing the contentions raised by the objecting bidder, the
governing board shall review its decision and determine whether to
affirm its prior award, modify the award, or choose to re-bid, set-
ting forth its reason or reasons therefor. After completion of the
review process, the political subdivision may proceed as it deems
to be in the public interest.
(b) Category B. Competitive bidding procedures shall be open to li-
censed public works contractors only after meeting preliminary supple-
mental qualifications established by the political subdivision. The
solicitation for bids in a category B procurement shall consist of two
(2) stages, an initial stage determining supplemental prequalifica-
tions for licensed contractors, either prime or specialty contractors,
followed by a stage during which bid prices will be accepted only from
prequalified contractors.
(i) Notice of the prequalification stage of the category B com-
petitive bidding process shall be given in the same manner that
notice of competitive bidding is provided for a category A com-
petitive bid request, providing a specific date and time by which
qualifications statements must be received. Political subdi-
visions may establish prequalification standards premised upon
demonstrated technical competence, experience constructing simi-
lar facilities, prior experience with the political subdivision,
available nonfinancial resources, equipment and personnel as
they relate to the subject project, and overall performance his-
tory based upon a contractor's entire body of work. Such request
must include the standards for evaluating the qualifications of
prospective bidders.
(ii) During the initial stage of the category B bidding process,
licensed contractors desiring to be prequalified to bid on a
project must submit a written response to a political subdivi-
sion's request for qualifications.
(iii) Written objections to prequalification procedures must be
received by the clerk, secretary or other authorized official of
the political subdivision at least three (3) business days before
the date and time upon which prequalification statements are due.
The administrative officer or governing board supervising the
bidding process shall respond to any such objection in writing
and communicate such response to the objector and all other con-
tractors seeking to prequalify, adjusting bidding timeframes if
necessary. After a review of qualification submittals, the po-
litical subdivision may select licensed contractors that meet the
prequalification standards. If any licensed contractor submits


a statement of qualifications but is not selected as a qualified
bidder, the political subdivision shall supply a written state-
ment of the reason or reasons why the contractor failed to meet
prequalification standards.
(iv) Any licensed contractor that fails the prequalification
stage can appeal any such determination to the governing board
within seven (7) days after transmittal of the prequalification
results to contest the determination. If the governing board
sustains the decision that a contractor fails to meet prequali-
fication standards, it shall state its reason or reasons for the
record. A governing board decision concerning prequalification
may be appealed to the public works contractors license board
no more than fourteen (14) days following any decision on appeal
made by the governing board. The public works contractors license
board shall decide any such appeal within thirty-five (35) days
of the filing of a timely appeal. The public works contractors
license board shall allow participation, written or oral, by the
appealing contractor and the political subdivision, either by
employing a hearing officer or otherwise. The public works con-
tractors license board shall not substitute its judgment for that
of the political subdivision, limiting its review to determining
whether the decision of the governing board is consistent with the
announced prequalification standards, whether the prequalifi-
cation standards comport with the law and whether the governing
board's decision is supported by the entirety of the record. The
decision of the public works contractors license board shall be
written and shall state the reason or reasons for the decision.
Category B prequalification procedures that are appealed shall be
stayed during the pendency of the prequalification appeal until
the public works contractors license board completes its review,
but in no instance more than forty-nine (49) days after the appel-
late decision of the governing board regarding prequalification.
Any licensed public works contractor affected by a decision on
appeal by the public works contractors license board may, within
twenty-eight (28) days of the final decision, seek judicial review
as provided by chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(v) Following the conclusion of the prequalification adminis-
trative procedures, the bidding stage shall proceed by the setting
of a time, date and place for the public opening of bids. In cir-
cumstances involving prequalified prime contractors, a notice
soliciting bids shall be transmitted to prequalified bidders at
least fourteen (14) days before the date of opening the bids. In
circumstances involving prequalified specialty or subordinate
contractors, the notice soliciting bids shall be published in the
same manner applicable to category A bids. The notice shall suc-
cinctly describe the project to be constructed. Copies of speci-
fications, bid forms, bidder's instructions, contract documents,
and general and special instructions shall be made available upon
request and payment of a reasonable plan copy fee by any eligible
bidder.


(vi) Written objections to specifications or bidding procedures
must be received by the clerk, secretary or other authorized of-
ficial of the political subdivision at least three (3) business
days before the date and time upon which bids are scheduled to be
opened.
(vii) All category B bids shall be presented or otherwise deliv-
ered under sealed cover to the clerk or other authorized agent
of the political subdivision designated by the instructions to
bidders with a concise statement marked on the outside generally
identifying the project to which the bid pertains.
(viii) If the political subdivision deems it is in the political
subdivision's best interest, it may require the bidder to provide
bid security in an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of the
amount bid. If required, a bid shall not be considered unless one
(1) of the forms of bidder's security is enclosed with it, and un-
less the bid is submitted in a form which substantially complies
with the form provided by the political subdivision. The politi-
cal subdivision may require that the bid security be in one (1) of
the following forms:
(A) Cash;
(B) A cashier's check made payable to the political subdivi-
sion;
(C) A certified check made payable to the political subdivi-
sion; or
(D) A bidder's bond executed by a qualified surety company,
made payable to the political subdivision.
(ix) Any category B bid received by a political subdivision may
not be withdrawn after the date and time set in the notice for open-
ing of bids. When sealed bids have been received, they shall be
opened in public by the governing board or the board's designee at
a designated place and time. The governing board's designee shall
thereafter compile and submit to the governing board for award or,
if authorized, approve the award. If identical bids are received,
the governing board may choose the bidder it prefers. If the suc-
cessful bidder fails to execute the contract, the amount of his
bidder's security may be forfeited to the political subdivision,
in the sole discretion of the political subdivision, and the pro-
ceeds shall be deposited in a designated fund out of which the ex-
penses for procuring substitute performance are paid.
(x) The political subdivision may, on the refusal or failure of
the successful bidder to execute the contract, award the contract
to the qualified bidder submitting the next lowest responsive bid.
If the governing board awards the contract to the next lowest qual-
ified bidder, the amount of the lowest qualified bidder's secu-
rity, if forfeited, shall be applied by the political subdivision
to the difference between the lowest responsive bid and the next
lowest responsive bid, and the surplus, if any, shall be returned
to the lowest bidder if cash or check is used, or to the surety on
the bidder's bond if a bond is used, less reasonable administra-


tive costs not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of
the bidder's security.
(xi) In its discretion, the governing board may reject all bids
presented and re-bid, or the governing board may, after finding it
to be a fact, pass a resolution declaring that the project sought
to be accomplished by the expenditure can be performed more eco-
nomically by purchasing goods and services on the open market. If
no bids are received, the governing board may make the expenditure
without further competitive bidding procedures.
(xii) If the governing board of any political subdivision chooses
to award a competitively bid contract involving the procurement of
public works construction to a bidder other than the apparent low
bidder, the political subdivision shall declare its reason or rea-
sons on the record and shall communicate such reason or reasons in
writing to all persons who have submitted a competing bid.
(xiii) If any participating bidder objects to such award, such
bidder shall respond in writing to the notice from the political
subdivision within seven (7) calendar days of the date of trans-
mittal of the notice, setting forth in such response the express
reason or reasons that the award decision of the governing board
is in error. Thereafter, staying performance of any procurement
until after addressing the contentions raised by the objecting
bidder, the governing board shall review its decision and deter-
mine whether to affirm its prior award, modify the award, or choose
to re-bid, setting forth its reason or reasons therefor. After
completion of the review process, the political subdivision may
proceed as it deems to be in the public interest.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-2806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2806. PROCURING SERVICES OR PERSONAL PROPERTY. (1) When a polit-
ical subdivision contemplates an expenditure to purchase or lease personal
property or to procure services, other than personal property or services
excluded pursuant to section 67-2803, Idaho Code, valued at or in excess of
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) but not to exceed one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) but not
to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the procurement
procedures of this subsection shall apply.
(a) The solicitation for bids shall be supplied to no fewer than three
(3) vendors by written means, either by electronic or physical deliv-
ery. The solicitation shall describe the personal property or services
to be purchased or leased in sufficient detail to allow a vendor dealing
in such goods or services to understand what the political subdivision
seeks to procure.
(b) The solicitation for bids shall describe the electronic or physi-
cal delivery method or methods authorized to submit a bid, the date and
time by which a bid proposal must be received by the clerk, secretary or
other authorized official of the political subdivision, and shall pro-
vide a reasonable time to respond to the solicitation, provided that ex-


cept in the event of an emergency, such time shall not be less than three
(3) business days.
(c) Written objections to specifications or bid procedures must be re-
ceived by the clerk, secretary or other authorized official of the po-
litical subdivision at least one (1) business day before the date and
time upon which bids are scheduled to be received.
(d) When written bids have been received, by either physical or elec-
tronic delivery, they shall be compiled and submitted to the governing
board or governing board-authorized official which shall approve the
responsive bid proposing the lowest procurement price or reject all
bids and publish notice for bids, as before.
(e) If the political subdivision finds that it is impractical or im-
possible to obtain three (3) bids for the proposed procurement, the
political subdivision may acquire the property in any manner the polit-
ical subdivision deems best from a qualified vendor quoting the lowest
price. When fewer than three (3) bids are considered, a description
of the efforts undertaken to procure at least three (3) bids shall be
documented by the political subdivision and such documentation shall
be maintained for at least six (6) months after any such procurement is
made. If two (2) or more bids are the same and the lowest responsive
bids, the authorized decision maker may accept the one (1) it chooses.
(2) When a political subdivision contemplates an expenditure to pur-
chase or lease personal property or to procure services, other than personal
property or services excluded pursuant to section 67-2803, Idaho Code, val-
ued in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the procurement procedures of this sub-
section shall apply.
(a) The purchase or lease shall be made pursuant to an open competitive
sealed bid process with the procurement to be made from the qualified
bidder submitting the lowest bid price complying with bidding pro-
cedures and meeting the specifications for the goods and/or services
sought to be procured.
(b) The request for bids shall set a date, time and place for the opening
of bids. Two (2) notices soliciting bids shall be published in the of-
ficial newspaper of the political subdivision. The first notice shall
be published at least two (2) weeks before the date for opening bids,
with the second notice to be published in the succeeding week at least
seven (7) days before the date that bids are scheduled to be opened. The
notice shall succinctly describe the personal property and/or service
to be procured. Copies of specifications, bid forms, bidder's instruc-
tions, contract documents, and general and special instructions shall
be made available upon request by any interested bidder.
(c) Written objections to specifications or bidding procedures must be
received by the clerk, secretary or other authorized official of the po-
litical subdivision at least three (3) business days before the date and
time upon which bids are scheduled to be opened.
(d) If the political subdivision deems it is in the political subdi-
vision's best interest, it may require the bidder to provide bid secu-
rity in an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of the amount bid.
If required, a bid shall not be considered unless one (1) of the forms


of bidder's security is enclosed with it, and unless the bid is submit-
ted in a form which substantially complies with the form provided by the
political subdivision. The political subdivision may require that the
bid security be in one (1) of the following forms:
(i) Cash;
(ii) A cashier's check made payable to the political subdivision;
(iii) A certified check made payable to the political subdivision;
or
(iv) A bidder's bond executed by a qualified surety company, made
payable to the political subdivision.
(e) Any bid received by the political subdivision may not be withdrawn
after the time set in the notice for opening of bids. When sealed bids
have been received, they shall be opened in public at a designated place
and time, thereafter to be compiled and submitted to the governing board
for award or, if a designee is authorized, for approval of the award.
(f) If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract, the amount
of his bidder's security may be forfeited to the political subdivision
at the sole discretion of the governing board and thereafter the pro-
ceeds may be deposited in a designated fund out of which the reasonable
expenses for procuring substitute performance are paid.
(g) The political subdivision may, on the refusal or failure of the suc-
cessful bidder to execute the contract, award the contract to the next
lowest qualified bidder. If the governing board awards the contract to
the next lowest qualified bidder, the amount of the lowest qualified
bidder's security may be applied by the political subdivision to the
difference between the lowest responsive bid and the next lowest re-
sponsive bid, and the surplus, if any, shall be returned to the lowest
bidder if cash or check is used, or to the surety on the bidder's bond
if a bond is used, less reasonable administrative costs not to exceed
twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the bidder's security.
(h) In its discretion, the governing board or its designee may reject
all bids presented and re-bid or, after finding it to be a fact, the gov-
erning board may pass a resolution declaring that the subject goods or
services can be procured more economically on the open market. If two
(2) or more bids are the same and the lowest responsive bids, the gov-
erning board or its designee may accept the one (1) it chooses. In its
discretion, the governing board of a political subdivision may preau-
thorize the purchase of equipment at a public auction.
(i) If the governing board of any political subdivision chooses to
award a competitively bid contract involving the procurement of per-
sonal property or services to a bidder other than the apparent low
bidder, the political subdivision shall declare its reason or reasons
on the record and shall communicate such reason or reasons in writing to
all who have submitted a competing bid.
(j) If any participating bidder objects to such award, such bidder
shall respond in writing to the notice from the political subdivision
within seven (7) calendar days of the date of transmittal of the notice,
setting forth in such response the express reason or reasons that the
award decision of the governing board is in error. Thereafter, staying
performance of any procurement until after addressing the contentions


raised by the objecting bidder, the governing board shall review its
decision and determine whether to affirm its prior award, modify the
award, or choose to re-bid, setting forth its reason or reasons there-
for. After completion of the review process, the political subdivision
may proceed as it deems to be in the public interest.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.